test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lassa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - lássá: # á-stems
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom: lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen: láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc: láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill: láásán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc: láásást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com: lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe: lásáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess: lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom: láásáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: láásái
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc: láásáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill: lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc: láásáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com: lásáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe: lásáittáá
